Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 2. Nature of Partnership

§ 17-21-201.
Partnership as entity.

A partnership is an entity.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-202.
Creation of partnership.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the association of two (2) or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a business for profit creates a partnership, whether or not the persons intend to create a partnership.

An association created under a statute other than this chapter, any predecessor law or comparable law of another jurisdiction is not a partnership.

In determining whether a partnership is created, the following rules apply:

Joint tenancy, tenancy in common, tenancy by the entireties, joint property, common property or part ownership does not by itself establish a partnership, even if the co-owners share profits made by the use of the property;

The sharing of gross returns does not by itself establish a partnership, even if the persons sharing them have a joint or common right or interest in property from which the returns are derived;

The receipt by a person of a share of the profits of a business is prima facie evidence that the person is a partner in the business, but that inference may not be drawn if the profits were received in payment:

Of a debt by installments or otherwise;

For services as an independent contractor or of wages or other compensation to an employee;

Of rent;

Of an annuity or other retirement or health benefit to a beneficiary, representative or designee of a deceased or retired partner;

Of interest or other charge on a loan, even if the amount of payment varies with the profits of the business, including a direct or indirect present or future ownership of the collateral or rights to income, proceeds or increase in value derived from the collateral; or

Of consideration for the sale of the goodwill of a business or other property by installments or otherwise.

Except as provided by W.S.

17-21-308

, persons who are not partners as to each other are not partners as to other persons.

A partnership created under this chapter is a general partnership and the partners are general partners of the partnership.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

In Wyoming, joint adventure partakes of nature of partnership

and is governed substantially by the same rules of law, the principal distinction being that a joint adventure usually relates to a single transaction, though it may be continued over a period of years. P & M Cattle Co. v. Holler, 559 P.2d 1019,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1977) (decided under former § 17-13-201).

Intent of parties controls. —

As in any contractual relationship, the intent of the parties is controlling. The parties must intend to create the relationship of joint adventure or partnership. P & M Cattle Co. v. Holler, 559 P.2d 1019,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1977) (decided under former § 17-13-202).

Where there is no express agreement to form partnership,

the question of whether such a relation exists must be gathered from the conduct, surrounding circumstances and the transactions between the parties. P & M Cattle Co. v. Holler, 559 P.2d 1019,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1977) (decided under former § 17-13-202).

Inference of partnership not conclusive. —

While subsection (a)(iv) (now (c)(iii)) creates an inference of partnership, that inference is not conclusive. P & M Cattle Co. v. Holler, 559 P.2d 1019,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1977) (decided under former § 17-13-202).

Subsection (a)(iv)'s (now (c)(iii)) prima facie evidence can be rebutted

by a showing that there was no intent to create a partnership, since intent of the parties is controlling. Murphy v. Stevens, 645 P.2d 82,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 333

(Wyo. 1982) (decided under former § 17-13-202).

Agreement to sell and divide profits not partnership. —

Where the prosecuting witness purchased and shipped apples under an agreement that defendant should sell them and proceeds in excess of cost should be divided, there was no partnership under the provisions of this section, and defendant retaining proceeds was guilty of embezzlement. State v. Bemis, 34 Wyo. 218, 242 P. 802,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1926) (decided under former § 17-13-202).

Contract arrangement to purchase, feed and sell cattle not intended as partnership. —

See P & M Cattle Co. v. Holler, 559 P.2d 1019,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1977) (decided under former § 17-13-202).

Evidence held sufficient to show partnership. —

Evidence was sufficient to sustain finding of trial court that plaintiff and defendant were partners, and as such each was liable for the debts of the partnership. Dinkelspeel v. Lewis, 50 Wyo. 380, 62 P.2d 294,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1936), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 380, 65 P.2d 246,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1937) (decided under former § 17-13-202).

Evidence held insufficient to show partnership. —

Parties did not conduct themselves as partners engaged in a business with the intention of sharing the profits and there was no clear error in the district court's conclusion that to the extent the calf-share agreement could be considered a joint venture, that venture was completed by 1996, when the last bull calf was born from a cow that a father and son purchased together. Redland v. Redland, 2012 WY 148, 288 P.3d 1173,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2012).

Contractor’s spouse was dismissed from litigation involving the contractor’s home improvement business because there was no competent evidence to establish a genuine issue of material fact as to whether the married couple agreed to share in the profits of the business or in the management or control of the business—both of which were essential to establish partnership formation. There also was no genuine issue of material fact as to whether the spouse held the spouse as a purported partner of the business. Norris v. Besel, 2019 WY 58, 442 P.3d 60,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2019).

Filing of a joint tax return, without more, was insufficient to establish that a contractor’s spouse was a partner in the contractor’s home improvement business. Norris v. Besel, 2019 WY 58, 442 P.3d 60,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2019).

Persons who intend to do things that constitute partnership are partners

whether their expressed purpose is to create or avoid the relationship. Murphy v. Stevens, 645 P.2d 82,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 333

(Wyo. 1982) (decided under former § 17-13-201).

Parties required to share profits and losses. —

It is the generally accepted rule that a partnership or a joint adventure cannot be inferred when the understanding with reference to the undertaking does not contemplate a mutual promise to share, in the fashion agreed upon, in the profits derived from the venture and the losses sustained in its operation. The absence of such a mutual interest is conclusive evidence that a partnership or joint adventure does not exist. True v. Hi-Plains Elevator Mach., 577 P.2d 991,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1978) (decided under former § 17-13-201).

Stated

in

Barton v. Barton, 996 P.2d 1,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Determining the Existence of a Partnership,” see XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1021 (1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Pleading denial of partnership in action by third person against alleged partners, 68 ALR2d 545.

Mining grubstake agreements distinguished from partnerships, 70 ALR2d 904.

§ 17-21-203.
Partnership property.

Property transferred to or otherwise acquired by a partnership is property of the partnership and not of the partners individually.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-204.
When property is partnership property.

Property is partnership property if acquired:

In the name of the partnership; or

In the name of one (1) or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person’s capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership, but without an indication of the name of the partnership.

Property is acquired in the name of the partnership by a transfer to:

The partnership in its name; or

One (1) or more partners in their capacity as partners in the partnership, if the name of the partnership is indicated in the instrument transferring title to the property.

Property is presumed to be partnership property if purchased with partnership assets, even if not acquired in the name of the partnership or of one (1) or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person’s capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership.

Property acquired in the name of one (1) or more of the partners, without an indication in the instrument transferring title to the property of the person’s capacity as a partner or of the existence of a partnership and without use of partnership assets, is presumed to be separate property even if used for partnership purposes.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Mortgages executed by partner-spouse invalid where spouses tenants by entirety. —

Mortgages executed by a husband alone were invalid; they were not valid transfers of partnership property, and did not constitute a valid transfer of the interest in property held by the husband and wife as tenants by the entireties. Colorado Nat'l Bank v. Miles, 711 P.2d 390,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 622

(Wyo. 1985) (decided under former § 17-13-203).

Evidence held to show property partnership property. —

Finding that shares of stock purchased in individual partners' names but paid for by partnership funds were partnership property was supported by the evidence. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 244, 11 P.2d 572,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1932), rehearing denied, 44 Wyo. 456, 13 P.2d 564,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1932) (decided under former § 17-13-203).

A finding that property purchased with partnership funds in respect to a mortgage thereon to secure partnership debt was in fact partnership property rather than a homestead of a deceased partner, though the wife did not sign the mortgage, was supported by the evidence. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 244, 11 P.2d 572,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1932), rehearing denied, 44 Wyo. 456, 13 P.2d 564,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1932) (decided under former § 17-13-203).

See B & R Builders v. Beilgard, 915 P.2d 1195,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1996).

Applied

in

Barton v. Barton, 996 P.2d 1,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Lessee interest of individual as becoming partnership asset of firm subsequently formed, 37 ALR2d 1076.

When real estate owned by partner before formation of partnership will be deemed to have become assets of the firm, 45 ALR2d 1009.

Right of partnership to recover damages for injury to partner, 36 ALR3d 1375.

Insurance on life of partner as partnership asset, 56 ALR3d 892.

Partner's breach of fiduciary duty to copartner on sale of partnership interest to another partner, 4 ALR4th 1122.